Massachusetts, session 194th, S2895.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 133 of the acts of 2022 is hereby amended by striking out section 3
and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 3. As consideration for the change in the conservation restriction authorized in
section 1, the town of Hanson shall, pursuant to section 3 of chapter 40 of the General Laws,
transfer the care, custody and control of a certain parcel of land consisting of 25.403 acres, more
or less, and identified on the town of Hanson assessors’ map as map 49, parcel 1-1A and a parcel
of land consisting of 3,922 square feet, more or less, and identified as assessors’ map 105, parcel
6 from the board of selectmen to the conservation commission for the purpose of wildlife,
recreation and forestry.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1